Utah statutes.
57-4a-3.   Document recordable without acknowledgment.

A document or a certified copy of a document may be recorded without acknowledgment if:

(1)  it was executed under law existing at the time of execution;

(2)  it evidences or affects title to real property; and

(3)  it was issued under the authority of:

(a)  the United States, another state, a court of record, a foreign government, or an Indian tribe; or

(b)  this state or any of its political subdivisions but, any document executed under the authority of this state or any of its political subdivisions after July 1, 1988, may not be recorded unless it includes a certificate of acknowledgement or jurat.

